Alabama, session 2026rs, SB109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
11 Section 1. Sections 1 through 14 of this act shall be
12 known and may be cited as the Peer-to-Peer Car Sharing Program
13 Act.
14 Section 2. As used in Sections 1 through 14 of this
15 act, the following words have the following meanings:
16 (1) CAR SHARING DELIVERY PERIOD. The period of time
17 during which a shared vehicle is being delivered to the
18 location of the car sharing start time, if applicable, as
19 documented by the governing peer-to-peer car sharing program
20 agreement.
21 (2) CAR SHARING PERIOD. The period of time that
22 commences with the car sharing delivery period or, if there is
23 no car sharing delivery period, that commences with the car
24 sharing start time and, in either case, ends at the car
25 sharing termination time.
26 (3) CAR SHARING START TIME. The time when the shared
27 vehicle becomes subject to the control of the shared vehicle
28 driver at or after the time the reservation of a shared
Page 1

driver at or after the time the reservation of a shared
SB109 Enrolled
29 vehicle is scheduled to begin, as documented in the records of
30 a peer-to-peer car sharing program.
31 (4) CAR SHARING TERMINATION TIME. The earliest of the
32 following events:
33 a. The expiration of the agreed-upon period of time
34 established for the use of a shared vehicle according to the
35 terms of the peer-to-peer car sharing program agreement, if
36 the shared vehicle is delivered to the agreed upon location in
37 the agreement.
38 b. When the shared vehicle is returned to a location as
39 alternatively agreed upon by the shared vehicle owner and the
40 shared vehicle driver as communicated through a peer-to-peer
41 car sharing program, if the alternatively agreed upon location
42 is incorporated into the peer-to-peer car sharing program
43 agreement.
44 c. When the shared vehicle owner, or the shared vehicle
45 owner's authorized designee, takes possession and control of
46 the shared vehicle.
47 (5) PEER-TO-PEER CAR SHARING. The authorized use of a
48 vehicle by an individual other than the vehicle's owner
49 through a peer-to-peer car sharing program. The term does not
50 include any of the following:
51 a. A rental or leasing transaction of tangible personal
52 property which is subject to Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title
53 40, Code of Alabama 1975, except as provided by Section
54 40-12-222(a)(2)b.1., Code of Alabama 1975.
55 b. Hiring, leasing, or renting a motor vehicle under a
56 rental agreement governed by Section 32-15-6, Code of Alabama
Page 2

rental agreement governed by Section 32-15-6, Code of Alabama
SB109 Enrolled
57 1975.
58 (6) PEER-TO-PEER CAR SHARING PROGRAM. A business
59 platform that connects vehicle owners with drivers to enable
60 the sharing of vehicles for financial consideration. The term
61 does not include any of the following:
62 a. A person engaging or continuing within this state in
63 the business of leasing or renting any automotive vehicle or
64 truck trailer, semitrailer, or house trailer that is subject
65 to Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title 40, Code of Alabama 1975.
66 b. A person facilitating a rental transaction of
67 tangible personal property which is subject to Article 4 of
68 Chapter 12 of Title 40, Code of Alabama 1975, except as
69 provided by Section 40-12-222(a)(2)b.1., Code of Alabama 1975.
70 c. A motor vehicle rental company licensed pursuant to
71 Section 27-7-5.1, Code of Alabama 1975.
72 d. A person facilitating rental transactions as
73 described in Section 40-2-11(a)(7)c., Code of Alabama 1975.
74 (7) PEER-TO-PEER CAR SHARING PROGRAM AGREEMENT. The
75 terms and conditions applicable to a shared vehicle owner and
76 a shared vehicle driver that govern the use of a shared
77 vehicle through a peer-to-peer car sharing program. The term
78 does not include any of the following:
79 a. A motor vehicle rental agreement governed by Section
80 32-15-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
81 b. A rental agreement with a motor vehicle rental
82 company licensed pursuant to Section 27-7-5.1, Code of Alabama
83 1975.
84 (8) SHARED VEHICLE. A vehicle that is available for
Page 3

(8) SHARED VEHICLE. A vehicle that is available for
SB109 Enrolled
85 sharing through a peer-to-peer car sharing program. The term
86 does not include an automotive vehicle or a truck trailer,
87 semitrailer, or house trailer that is subject to Article 4 of
88 Chapter 12 of Title 40, Code of Alabama 1975, except as
89 provided by Section 40-12-222(a)(2)b.1., Code of Alabama 1975.
90 (9) SHARED VEHICLE DRIVER. An individual who has been
91 authorized to drive a shared vehicle by the shared vehicle
92 owner under a peer-to-peer car sharing program agreement. The
93 term does not include a person hiring, leasing, or renting a
94 motor vehicle under a rental agreement with a motor vehicle
95 rental company licensed pursuant to Section 27-7-5.1, Code of
96 Alabama 1975, or under a rental agreement governed by Section
97 32-15-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
98 (10) SHARED VEHICLE OWNER. The registered owner, or a
99 person or entity designated by the registered owner, of a
100 vehicle made available for sharing to shared vehicle drivers
101 through a peer-to-peer car sharing program. The term does not
102 include any of the following:
103 a. A lessor that is subject to Article 4 of Chapter 12
104 of Title 40, Code of Alabama 1975, except as provided by
105 Section 40-12-222(a)(2)b.1., Code of Alabama 1975.
106 b. A motor vehicle rental company licensed pursuant to
107 Section 27-7-5.1, Code of Alabama 1975.
108 Section 3. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a
109 peer-to-peer car sharing program shall assume liability of a
110 shared vehicle owner for bodily injury or property damage to
111 third parties during the car sharing period in an amount
112 stated in the peer-to-peer car sharing program agreement. The
Page 4

stated in the peer-to-peer car sharing program agreement. The
SB109 Enrolled
113 amount shall not be less than the proof of financial
114 responsibility required under Chapter 7 of Title 32, Code of
115 Alabama 1975.
116 (b) Notwithstanding the definition of "car sharing
117 termination time," the assumption of liability under
118 subsection (a) does not apply to any shared vehicle owner
119 under either of the following circumstances:
120 (1) When a shared vehicle owner makes an intentional or
121 fraudulent material misrepresentation or omission to the
122 peer-to-peer car sharing program before the car sharing period
123 in which the loss occurred.
124 (2) When a shared vehicle owner acts in concert with a
125 shared vehicle driver who fails to return the shared vehicle
126 pursuant to the terms of the peer-to-peer car sharing program
127 agreement.
128 (c) Notwithstanding the definition of "car sharing
129 termination time," the assumption of liability under
130 subsection (a) applies to bodily injury or property damage to
131 third parties as required under Chapter 7 of Title 32, Code of
132 Alabama 1975.
133 (d) A peer-to-peer car sharing program shall ensure
134 that during each car sharing period the shared vehicle owner
135 and the shared vehicle driver are insured under a motor
136 vehicle liability insurance policy that does all of the
137 following:
138 (1) Provides insurance coverage in amounts no less than
139 the minimum amounts required for proof of financial
140 responsibility described under Section 32-7-2, Code of Alabama
Page 5

responsibility described under Section 32-7-2, Code of Alabama
SB109 Enrolled
141 1975.
142 (2) Does either of the following:
143 a. Recognizes that the shared vehicle insured under the
144 policy is made available and used through a peer-to-peer car
145 sharing program.
146 b. Does not exclude the use of a shared vehicle by a
147 shared vehicle driver.
148 (e) The insurance required under subsection (d) may be
149 purchased by any of the following:
150 (1) A shared vehicle owner.
151 (2) A shared vehicle driver.
152 (3) A peer-to-peer car sharing program.
153 (4) Any combination of a shared vehicle owner, a shared
154 vehicle driver, or a peer-to-peer car sharing program.
155 (f) The insurance described in subsection (e), that is
156 satisfying the requirement of subsection (d), shall be primary
157 during each car sharing period. If a claim occurs in another
158 state with minimum financial responsibility limits higher than
159 those described in Section 32-7-2, Code of Alabama 1975,
160 during the car sharing period, the insurance maintained under
161 subsection (e) shall satisfy the difference in minimum
162 coverage amounts, up to the applicable policy limits.
163 (g) The insurer, insurers, or peer-to-peer car sharing
164 program providing coverage under subsection (d) or (e) shall
165 assume primary liability for a claim when either of the
166 following occurs:
167 (1) A dispute exists as to who was in control of the
168 shared vehicle at the time of the loss and the peer-to-peer
Page 6

shared vehicle at the time of the loss and the peer-to-peer
SB109 Enrolled
169 car sharing program does not have available, did not retain,
170 or fails to provide the information required by Section 6.
171 (2) A dispute exists as to whether the shared vehicle
172 was returned to the alternatively agreed upon location as
173 required under Section 2(4)b.
174 (h) If insurance purchased by a shared vehicle owner or
175 shared vehicle driver pursuant to subsection (e) has lapsed or
176 does not provide the required coverage, insurance maintained
177 by a peer-to-peer car sharing program shall provide the
178 coverage required by subsection (d) beginning with the first
179 dollar of a claim and shall have the duty to defend the claim
180 except under circumstances as set forth in subsection (b).
181 (i) Coverage under an automobile insurance policy
182 maintained by the peer-to-peer car sharing program may not be
183 dependent on another automobile insurer first denying a claim
184 and may not require another automobile insurance policy to
185 first deny a claim.
186 (j) Nothing in this section does either of the
187 following:
188 (1) Limits the liability of a peer-to-peer car sharing
189 program for any act or omission of the peer-to-peer car
190 sharing program which results in injury to any person as a
191 result of the use of a shared vehicle through a peer-to-peer
192 car sharing program.
193 (2) Limits the ability of the peer-to-peer car sharing
194 program to seek indemnification, by contract, from the shared
195 vehicle owner or the shared vehicle driver for economic loss
196 sustained by the peer-to-peer car sharing program resulting
Page 7

sustained by the peer-to-peer car sharing program resulting
SB109 Enrolled
197 from a breach of the terms and conditions of the peer-to-peer
198 car sharing program agreement.
199 Section 4. When the owner of a vehicle registers as a
200 shared vehicle owner on a peer-to-peer car sharing program,
201 and before the owner makes a vehicle available for
202 peer-to-peer car sharing on the peer-to-peer car sharing
203 program, the peer-to-peer car sharing program shall notify the
204 owner that, if the vehicle has a lien against the vehicle, the
205 use of the vehicle through the peer-to-peer car sharing
206 program, including use without physical damage coverage, may
207 violate the terms of the contract with the lienholder.
208 Section 5. (a) An authorized insurer that writes motor
209 vehicle liability insurance in this state may exclude any and
210 all coverage and the duty to defend or indemnify for any claim
211 afforded under a shared vehicle owner's motor vehicle
212 liability insurance policy, including, but not limited to, all
213 of the following:
214 (1) Liability coverage for bodily injury and property
215 damage.
216 (2) Personal injury protection coverage.
217 (3) Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage.
218 (4) Medical payments coverage.
219 (5) Comprehensive physical damage coverage.
220 (6) Collision physical damage coverage.
221 (b) Nothing in Sections 1 through 14 of this act
222 invalidates, limits, or restricts any of the following:
223 (1) An exclusion contained in a motor vehicle liability
224 insurance policy, including any insurance policy in use or
Page 8

insurance policy, including any insurance policy in use or
SB109 Enrolled
225 approved for use, which excludes coverage for motor vehicles
226 made available for rent, sharing, hire, or for any business
227 use.
228 (2) An insurer's ability under existing law to
229 underwrite any insurance policy.
230 (3) An insurer's ability under existing law to cancel
231 and nonrenew policies.
232 Section 6. (a) A peer-to-peer car sharing program shall
233 collect and verify records pertaining to the use of all shared
234 vehicles used in a peer-to-peer car sharing program,
235 including, but not limited to, all of the following:
236 (1) The number of times the shared vehicle is used.
237 (2) Car sharing period pick up and drop off locations.
238 (3) Fees paid by the shared vehicle driver.
239 (4) Revenues received by the shared vehicle owner.
240 (b) To facilitate a claim coverage investigation,
241 settlement, negotiation, or litigation, the peer-to-peer car
242 sharing program, upon request, shall provide the records
243 collected under subsection (a) to the shared vehicle owner,
244 the shared vehicle owner's insurer, or the shared vehicle
245 driver's insurer.
246 (c) The peer-to-peer car sharing program shall retain
247 the records for a time period not less than the applicable
248 personal injury statute of limitations.
249 Section 7. A peer-to-peer car sharing program and a
250 shared vehicle owner shall be exempt from vicarious liability,
251 consistent with 49 U.S.C. § 30106, under any state or local
252 law that imposes liability solely based on vehicle ownership.
Page 9

law that imposes liability solely based on vehicle ownership.
SB109 Enrolled
253 Section 8. A motor vehicle insurer that defends or
254 indemnifies a claim against a shared vehicle that is excluded
255 under the terms of its policy shall have the right to seek
256 contribution from the motor vehicle insurer of the
257 peer-to-peer car sharing program if the claim is both of the
258 following:
259 (1) Made against the shared vehicle owner or the shared
260 vehicle driver for loss or injury that occurs during the car
261 sharing period.
262 (2) Excluded under the terms of its policy.
263 Section 9. (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
264 a peer-to-peer car sharing program shall have an insurable
265 interest in a shared vehicle during the car sharing period.
266 (b) A peer-to-peer car sharing program may own and
267 maintain as the named insured one or more policies of motor
268 vehicle liability insurance that provide coverage for any of
269 the following:
270 (1) Liabilities assumed by the peer-to-peer car sharing
271 program under a peer-to-peer car sharing program agreement.
272 (2) Any liability of the shared vehicle owner.
273 (3) Damage or loss to the shared motor vehicle.
274 (4) Any liability of the shared vehicle driver.
275 Section 10. Each peer-to-peer car sharing program
276 agreement made in this state shall disclose to the shared
277 vehicle owner and the shared vehicle driver all of the
278 following:
279 (1) Any right of the peer-to-peer car sharing program
280 to seek indemnification from the shared vehicle owner or the
Page 10

to seek indemnification from the shared vehicle owner or the
SB109 Enrolled
281 shared vehicle driver for economic loss sustained by the
282 peer-to-peer car sharing program resulting from a breach of
283 the terms and conditions of the peer-to-peer car sharing
284 program agreement.
285 (2) That a motor vehicle liability insurance policy
286 issued to the shared vehicle owner for the shared vehicle or
287 to the shared vehicle driver does not provide a defense or
288 indemnification for any claim asserted by the peer-to-peer car
289 sharing program.
290 (3) That the peer-to-peer car sharing program's
291 insurance coverage on the shared vehicle owner and the shared
292 vehicle driver is in effect only during each car sharing
293 period and that, for any use of the shared vehicle by the
294 shared vehicle driver after the car sharing termination time,
295 the shared vehicle driver and the shared vehicle owner may not
296 have insurance coverage.
297 (4) The daily rate, fees, and, if applicable, any
298 insurance or protection package costs that are charged to the
299 shared vehicle owner or the shared vehicle driver.
300 (5) That the shared vehicle owner's motor vehicle
301 liability insurance may not provide coverage for a shared
302 vehicle, including as a commercial rental.
303 (6) An emergency telephone number to personnel capable
304 of fielding roadside assistance and other customer service
305 inquiries.
306 (7) Whether there are conditions under which a shared
307 vehicle driver must maintain a personal automobile insurance
308 policy with certain applicable coverage limits on a primary
Page 11

policy with certain applicable coverage limits on a primary
SB109 Enrolled
309 basis in order to book a shared motor vehicle.
310 (8) The tire requirements for motor vehicles operated
311 on the highways of the state under Section 32-5-210, Code of
312 Alabama 1975.
313 Section 11. (a) A peer-to-peer car sharing program may
314 not enter into a peer-to-peer car sharing program agreement
315 with an individual who will operate a shared vehicle unless
316 the individual meets any of the following requirements:
317 (1) Is 18 years of age or older and holds a driver
318 license issued under Section 32-6-1, Code of Alabama 1975,
319 which authorizes him or her to operate vehicles of the class
320 of the shared vehicle.
321 (2) Is a nonresident who meets both of the following
322 requirements:
323 a. Has a driver license issued by the state or country
324 of his or her residence which authorizes him or her to drive
325 vehicles of the class of the shared vehicle.
326 b. Is 18 years of age or older.
327 (3) Is 18 years of age or older and is specifically
328 authorized by Section 32-6-2, Code of Alabama 1975, to drive
329 vehicles of the class of the shared vehicle.
330 (b) A peer-to-peer car sharing program shall keep a
331 record of all of the following:
332 (1) The name and address of the shared vehicle driver.
333 (2) A copy of the driver license of the shared vehicle
334 driver and each other person, if any, who will operate the
335 shared vehicle.
336 (3) The place of issuance of the driver license.
Page 12

(3) The place of issuance of the driver license.
SB109 Enrolled
337 Section 12. (a) A peer-to-peer car sharing program
338 shall have sole responsibility for any equipment, including a
339 Global Positioning System or other special equipment, that is
340 placed in or on the shared vehicle to monitor or facilitate
341 the car sharing transaction.
342 (b) A peer-to-peer car sharing program shall indemnify
343 and hold harmless the shared vehicle owner for any damage to
344 or theft of such equipment during the car sharing period not
345 caused by the shared vehicle owner.
346 (c) A peer-to-peer car sharing program may seek
347 indemnity from the shared vehicle driver for any loss or
348 damage to such equipment that occurs during the car sharing
349 period.
350 Section 13. (a) When a vehicle owner registers as a
351 shared vehicle owner on a peer-to-peer car sharing program,
352 and before a shared vehicle owner makes a shared vehicle
353 available for peer-to-peer car sharing on the peer-to-peer car
354 sharing program, the peer-to-peer car sharing program shall do
355 both of the following:
356 (1) Verify that the shared vehicle does not have any
357 safety recalls on the vehicle for which the repairs have not
358 been made.
359 (2) Notify the shared vehicle owner of the requirements
360 under subsection (b).
361 (b)(1) If a shared vehicle owner has received an actual
362 notice of a safety recall on a shared vehicle, the shared
363 vehicle owner may not make the vehicle available as a shared
364 vehicle on a peer-to-peer car sharing program until the safety
Page 13

vehicle on a peer-to-peer car sharing program until the safety
SB109 Enrolled
365 recall repair has been made.
366 (2) If a shared vehicle owner receives an actual notice
367 of a safety recall on a shared vehicle while the shared
368 vehicle is made available on the peer-to-peer car sharing
369 program, the shared vehicle owner shall change the status of
370 the vehicle to unavailable as soon as practicably possible.
371 The shared vehicle may not be listed as available until the
372 safety recall repair has been made.
373 (3) If a shared vehicle owner receives an actual notice
374 of a safety recall on a shared vehicle while the shared
375 vehicle is in the possession of a shared vehicle driver and
376 engaged in peer-to-peer car sharing during a car sharing
377 period, the shared vehicle owner shall notify the peer-to-peer
378 car sharing program about the safety recall as soon as
379 practicably possible after receiving the notice of the safety
380 recall. The shared vehicle may not be listed as available
381 until the safety recall repair has been made.
382 Section 14. (a) Nothing in Sections 1 through 14 of
383 this act shall expand or restrict in any manner the respective
384 rights, obligations, or limitations of motor vehicle
385 manufacturers and licensed new motor vehicle dealers as set
386 forth in Chapter 20 of Title 8, Code of Alabama 1975.
387 (b) Nothing in Sections 1 through 14 of this act limits
388 the right of an airport authority to regulate and impose fees
389 on peer-to-peer car sharing programs that enable peer-to-peer
390 car sharing at an airport.
391 Section 15. Section 40-12-222, Code of Alabama 1975, as
392 last amended by Act 2025-240, is amended to read as follows:
Page 14

last amended by Act 2025-240, is amended to read as follows:
SB109 Enrolled
393 "§40-12-222
394 (a)(1) In addition to all other taxes now imposed by
395 law, there is hereby levied and shall be collected a privilege
396 or license tax on each person engaging or continuing within
397 this state in the business of leasing or renting tangible
398 personal property at the rate of four percent of the gross
399 proceeds derived by the lessor from the lease or rental of
400 tangible personal property.
401 (2) Thea. Except as provided in paragraph b., the
402 privilege or license tax on each person engaging or continuing
403 within this state in the business of leasing or renting any
404 automotive vehicle or truck trailer, semitrailer, or house
405 trailer shall be at the rate of one and one-half percent of
406 the gross proceeds derived by the lessor from the lease or
407 rental of such automotive vehicle or truck trailer,
408 semitrailer, or house trailer.
409 b.1. For purposes of paragraph a. only, the business of
410 leasing or renting an automotive vehicle includes peer-to-peer
411 car sharing as defined in Section 2 of the act amending this
412 section. The gross proceeds collected by a peer-to-peer car
413 sharing program as the leasing facilitator under Sections 1
414 through 14 of the act amending this section shall be subject
415 to the tax set forth in paragraph a. only for those
416 transactions where the shared vehicle was not subject to the
417 applicable sales and use taxes upon purchase in the
418 jurisdiction in which the shared vehicle owner purchased the
419 vehicle or if sales and use taxes were not paid at the time of
420 initial titling and registration in this state.
Page 15

initial titling and registration in this state.
SB109 Enrolled
421 2. The peer-to-peer car sharing program shall require a
422 shared vehicle owner to certify if the shared vehicle owner
423 paid the applicable sales and use taxes upon purchase or at
424 the time of initial titling and registration in this state.
425 The peer-to-peer car sharing program shall retain records of a
426 shared vehicle owner's certification under this paragraph.
427 c. Notwithstanding paragraph b., beginning October 1,
428 2026, any local rental tax levied pursuant to Section
429 45-37-244.01 shall be collected and remitted by any
430 peer-to-peer car sharing program.
431 (3) The tax levied in this article shall not apply to
432 any leasing or rental, as lessor, by the state or any
433 municipality or county in the state, or any public corporation
434 organized under the laws of the state, including, without
435 limiting the generality of the foregoing, any corporation
436 organized under the provisions of Division 1 of Article 4 of
437 Chapter 54, Title 11Division 1 of Article 4 of Chapter 54 of
438 Title 11.
439 (4) The privilege or license tax on each person or firm
440 engaging or continuing within this state in the business of
441 the leasing and rental of linens and garments shall be at the
442 rate of two percent of the gross proceeds derived by the
443 lessor from the lease or rental of the linens and garments.
444 (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), nothing shall
445 prohibit a lessor subject to a state or local privilege or
446 license tax from passing the amounts on to a lessee by adding
447 the taxes to the leasing price or otherwise; provided,
448 however, that all amounts passed on to the lessee shall be
Page 16

however, that all amounts passed on to the lessee shall be
SB109 Enrolled
449 includable in the gross proceeds derived from the lease of
450 tangible personal property which shall be subject to the
451 privilege or license tax owed by the lessor.
452 (c) The state and applicable local privilege or license
453 taxes applicable to a lease or rental transaction to which a
454 lessor is subject shall be determined as follows:
455 (1) Except for automotive vehicles as provided in
456 subdivision (2) and commercial aircraft as provided in
457 subdivision (3), the following shall apply:
458 a. When tangible personal property is delivered to the
459 lessee by the lessor or his or her agent, the privilege or
460 license tax levy shall be determined based on where the
461 property is delivered.
462 b. When tangible personal property is picked up at the
463 lessor's rental location by the lessee or his or her agent,
464 the privilege or license tax levy shall be determined based on
465 the rental location.
466 (2) For automotive vehicles required to be registered
467 pursuant to Section 32-6-61, each lease payment is considered
468 a separate lease transaction and occurs in the location as
469 provided below and the following rules shall apply:
470 a. The privilege or license tax levy on any
471 nonrecurring gross proceeds due at the inception of the lease
472 to a new motor vehicle dealer or a used motor vehicle dealer
473 licensed pursuant to Section 40-12-391, including any
474 capitalized cost reduction or other fee that is retained by
475 the dealer in connection with its initiation of the lease,
476 shall be determined based on the location of the dealer where
Page 17

shall be determined based on the location of the dealer where
SB109 Enrolled
477 the lease was initiated.
478 b. The privilege or license tax levy on gross proceeds
479 other than those described in paragraph a., including the
480 initial lease or rental payment and all subsequent lease or
481 rental payments, shall be determined based on the garage
482 address of the lessee as provided to the county licensing
483 official. The lessor is considered to be engaging or
484 continuing within this state in the business of leasing or
485 renting tangible personal property when its lessee has a
486 garage address within this state.
487 (3) For commercial aircraft, which are aircraft used by
488 certificated or licensed air carriers, the privilege or
489 license tax levy on gross proceeds, including the initial
490 lease or rental payment and all subsequent lease or rental
491 payments, shall be determined based on the location of the
492 aircraft when the aircraft is first entered into revenue
493 service."
494 Section 16. This act shall become effective on October
495 1, 2026.
Page 18

1, 2026.
SB109 Enrolled
496
497
498
499
500
501
502 ________________________________________________
503 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
504
505
506
507 ________________________________________________
508 Speaker of the House of Representatives
509
510
511 SB109
512 Senate 27-Jan-26
513 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
514 the Senate.
515
516 Patrick Harris,
517 Secretary.
518
519
520
521
522 House of Representatives
523 Passed: 12-Feb-26
524
525
526
527
528 By: Senator Elliott
Page 19